Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
FEE REPORTING REQUIREMENTS
SECTION 1.
 ORS 92.365 is amended to read:
92.365. (1) The information required  under ORS 92.345 and 92.355 shall be kept current by the
subdivider or series partitioner.  Any material change in the information furnished to the Real Estate
Commissioner shall be reported by the subdivider  or series partitioner within 10 days after the
change occurs.
(2) A subdivider  or series partitioner shall be responsible for the accuracy of and for providing
all information required by ORS 92.345, 92.355 and  this section for as long as the subdivider or se-
ries partitioner retains any unsold lot, parcel or interest in  the subdivision or series partition to
which the information pertains.
(3) A  developer who acquires a lot, parcel or interest in a subdivision or series partition shall
be responsible for as long as the developer retains any  unsold lot, parcel or interest in the subdi-
vision or series partition for all material changes in the  information contained in the public report
which the developer receives on acquisition of the property:
(a) Which the developer causes by action of the developer; and
(b) Concerning the zoning,  sewage disposal and water supply which substantially affect the in-
tended use of the property as stated in the public report.
(4) A developer shall accurately report to the commissioner a material change  specified in sub-
section (3) of this section within 10 days after the change occurs. However, a  developer who ac-
quires less than 11 lots,  parcels or interests in a subdivision or series partition during a six
consecutive month period shall only be responsible  for a material change specified in subsection
Enrolled Senate Bill 1049 (SB 1049-A) Page 1
(3)(b) of this section and may revise a public report to reflect such material change without report-
ing the material change to the commissioner.
(5) The commissioner shall require a fee sufficient to recover any administrative expenses  after
receipt of a material change notice if, because of the changes, a  public report must be issued or
revised by the commissioner. The fee is subject to prior approval  of the Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services [ and a  report to the Emergency Board prior to adopting the fee ] and shall be
within the budget authorized by the Legislative Assembly  as that budget may be modified by the
Emergency Board.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 92.415 is amended to read:
92.415. When an examination is to be made of subdivided or series partitioned lands  situated in
the State  of Oregon, or of subdivided lands situated outside the state which will be offered for sale
or lease within this state, the Real Estate Commissioner, in addition to  the filing fee provided in
ORS [ 92.355] 92.345 , may require the subdivider or series  partitioner to advance payment of an
amount estimated by the commissioner  to be the expense incurred in going to and returning from
the location of the project, and an  amount estimated to be necessary to cover the additional expense
of such  examination, subject to prior approval of the Oregon Department of Administrative Services
[and a report to the Emergency Board prior to adopting  the fee ] and [ shall be ] within the budget au-
thorized by the Legislative Assembly as that budget may be modified by the  Emergency Board. The
amounts estimated by the commissioner, under this section shall  be based upon any applicable limits
established and regulated by the Oregon  Department of Administrative Services under ORS 292.220.
SECTION 3.  ORS 100.670 is amended to read:
100.670. (1) A developer or other person required to file materials or information with  the Real
Estate Commissioner under  ORS 100.005 to 100.910 shall pay to the commissioner a fee as required
under subsections (2) and (3) of this section  for the review, approval and handling of the filings by
the commissioner at the time of the initial filing with the commissioner.
(2) A fee charged by the commissioner under subsection (1) of this section shall  be determined
by the commissioner to cover the costs of the commissioner’s  review, approval or revision activity.
The fee shall be based upon an hourly  rate that is subject to prior approval of the Oregon Depart-
ment of Administrative Services [ and a report to the Emergency Board prior to adopting the  fee ] and
shall be within the budget authorized by the Legislative Assembly as that budget may be  modified
by the Emergency Board.
(3) The commissioner shall collect a deposit  of $100 from a developer at the time of submitting
a filing described in  subsection (1) of this section. The amount of the deposit shall be deducted from
the final fee computed as provided in subsection (2) of this section.
SECTION 4.  ORS 350.175 is amended to read:
350.175. (1) The Director of the Office of Community Colleges and Workforce Development  may
issue certificates for passing approved high  school equivalency tests such as the General Educa-
tional Development (GED) test to persons who  demonstrate satisfactory performance in tests pre-
scribed under subsection (2) of this section or meet  the requirements of any prescribed evaluative
procedure.
(2) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission by rule may prescribe tests and other  ap-
propriate evaluation procedures for the purposes of subsection (1) of this section and may establish
age, residence and other relevant qualifications for applicants.
(3) The Office of Community  Colleges and Workforce Development may utilize its personnel and
facilities for the administration of this section, and the commission may  establish by rule a
nonrefundable application fee. The fee may be waived by the commission in case of hardship.
(4) Subject to  prior approval of the Oregon Department of Administrative Services [ and a report
to the Emergency Board prior to adopting the  fee ], the fee established under subsection (3) of this
section shall not exceed the cost of administering the program,  as authorized by the Legislative
Assembly within the office’s budget, as the budget may be modified by the Emergency Board.
(5) All moneys received under this section shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit
of the Office  of Community Colleges and Workforce Development and shall be used exclusively for
Enrolled Senate Bill 1049 (SB 1049-A) Page 2
administration of this section. The Office  of Community Colleges and Workforce Development shall
keep a record of all moneys deposited in such account. The record  shall indicate by separate cu-
mulative accounts the source from which the moneys are derived and the individual activity against
which each withdrawal is charged.
(6) The Director of the Office of Community Colleges and Workforce Development  shall consult
with the Superintendent of Public Instruction on all matters related to evaluation procedures  used
to measure equivalent achievement under this section. The  superintendent is authorized to make
independent recommendations on evaluation procedures to the office in  those cases where the
superintendent’s judgment differs from that of the director.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 438.130 is amended to read:
438.130. (1) The application for a license for a  clinical laboratory shall be made on forms pro-
vided by the  Oregon Health Authority and shall be executed by the owner or one of the owners or
by an officer of the firm or corporation owning the clinical laboratory, or  in the case of a county
or municipality, by the public official responsible for operation of the laboratory, or in the  case of
an institution, by the administrator of the institution. The application  shall contain the names of the
owner, the director or directors of the clinical laboratory, the location and physical description  of
the clinical laboratory, the  laboratory specialties for which a license is requested and such other
information as the authority may require.
(2)(a) The application shall be accompanied by an annual or biennial license fee to be estab-
lished by the authority. The fee shall be based on test volume, test complexity, the number  of spe-
cialties performed and private laboratory  accreditation. For each level of laboratory testing, the fee
shall be not more than 100 percent of the corresponding  fee charged by the federal laboratory cer-
tification program known  as the Clinical Laboratory Improvement Amendments of 1988 (P.L. 100-578,
42 U.S.C. 201  and 263a) in effect on July 1, 1999. The fee for substance of abuse screening labora-
tories not certified under the Clinical  Laboratory Improvement Amendments of 1988 shall be com-
parable to the clinical laboratory fee established under this section.
(b) The authority may establish prorated fees  for licenses issued for a year or less and when
there is a change in the laboratory’s owner, director or address. A  prorated license fee shall be is-
sued to a laboratory accredited by an organization recognized by the authority.
(3) Unless sooner voided, suspended or revoked, all licenses issued under this section expire on
June 30 of the one-year or two-year cycle following the date of issuance or on such  date as may be
specified by authority rule. Licenses issued under this section  shall be renewable in the manner
prescribed by the authority.
(4) Subject to  prior approval of the Oregon Department of Administrative Services [ and a report
to the Emergency Board prior to adopting the  fees and charges ], the fees and charges established
under this section shall  not exceed the cost of administering the regulatory program of the authority
pertaining to the purpose for which  the fee or charge is established, as authorized by the Legislative
Assembly within the authority’s budget, as the budget may be modified by the Emergency Board.
SECTION 6.  ORS 448.410 is amended to read:
448.410. (1) The Environmental Quality Commission shall:
(a) Adopt rules necessary to carry out the provisions of ORS 448.410 to 448.430 and 448.992.
(b) Classify all sewage treatment works. In classifying the sewage treatment works, the com-
mission shall take  into consideration size and type, character of wastewater to be treated and other
physical conditions affecting the  sewage treatment works and the skill, knowledge and experience
required of an operator.
(c) Certify persons qualified to supervise the operation of sewage treatment works.
(d) Subject to the prior approval of the Oregon Department of Administrative Services  [ and a
report to  the Emergency Board prior to adopting the fee ], establish a schedule of fees for certification
under paragraph  (c) of this subsection. The fees established under the schedule shall be sufficient
to pay the costs incurred by the Department of Environmental Quality in carrying out the provisions
of ORS 448.410 to 448.430 and  448.992 and shall be within the budget authorized by the Legislative
Assembly as that budget may be modified by the Emergency Board.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1049 (SB 1049-A) Page 3
(2) The commission may  grant a variance from the requirements of ORS 448.415, according to
criteria established by rule by the commission.
(3) In adopting rules under this section, the commission shall consult with the  Oregon Health
Authority in order to coordinate  rules adopted under this section with rules adopted by the au-
thority under ORS 448.450.
SECTION 7.  ORS 448.450 is amended to read:
448.450. (1) The Oregon Health Authority shall:
(a) Adopt  rules necessary to carry out the provisions of ORS 448.450 to 448.465, 448.992 and
448.994.
(b) Classify all potable water treatment plants and water distribution systems actually used  or
intended for use by the public. In classifying the potable water  treatment plants and water distrib-
ution systems, the authority shall take into consideration size and type,  character of water to be
treated and other  physical conditions affecting the treatment plants and distribution systems and the
skill, knowledge and experience required of an operator.
(c) Certify persons qualified to supervise the  operation of a potable water treatment plant or a
water distribution system.
(d) Subject to  the prior approval of the Oregon Department of Administrative Services [ and a
report to  the Emergency Board prior to adopting the fee ], establish a schedule of fees for certification
under paragraph (c) of this subsection. The fees established under the schedule shall be  sufficient
to pay  the cost of the authority in carrying out the provisions of ORS 448.450 to 448.465, 448.992
and 448.994 and shall be within the budget  authorized by the Legislative Assembly as that budget
may be modified by the Emergency Board.
(2) Notwithstanding the authority of the Oregon  Health Authority to establish fees for certif-
ication under subsection (1)(d) of this section, the authority will not establish fees  for certification
of operators of water systems serving ground water to fewer than 150 service connections.
(3) In adopting rules under this section, the authority shall consult with the Department  of En-
vironmental Quality in order to  coordinate rules adopted under this section with rules adopted by
the Environmental Quality Commission under ORS 448.410.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 453.408 is amended to read:
453.408. (1) The Department of Revenue, in consultation with the State Fire Marshal,  is au-
thorized to establish those rules and  procedures for the implementation and enforcement of ORS
453.396 to 453.414 that are consistent with its  provisions and are considered necessary and appro-
priate.
(2) The State Fire Marshal by rule may add persons or substances to or exempt  persons or
substances from liability for the fee imposed under ORS 453.396 to 453.414 to conform to the re-
porting requirements established by the State Fire Marshal under  the Community Right to Know
and Protection Act.
(3) Before final adoption of  initial rules to carry out the provisions of ORS 453.396 to 453.414
or subsequent amendment of the initial fee schedules established under ORS 453.398, the State Fire
Marshal shall obtain prior approval of the  fees by the Oregon Department of Administrative Ser-
vices [ and shall submit a report to the Emergency Board prior to adopting the fees ]. The  fees estab-
lished under ORS 453.396 to 453.414 shall be within the budget authorized by the Legislative
Assembly as that budget may be modified  by the Emergency Board. The fees shall not exceed the
cost of the program.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 453.894 is amended to read:
453.894. (1) The Oregon Health Authority shall establish by rule  a schedule of fees for at least
the following:
(a) Initial licenses and renewal under ORS 105.555, 431.175 and 453.855 to 453.912.
(b) Training courses and examinations conducted by or on behalf of the authority.
(c) Reexaminations for failing the initial examinations.
(d) Review of work plans.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1049 (SB 1049-A) Page 4
(2) The fees established under subsection (1) of  this section shall be based upon the costs of the
authority in carrying out the provisions of ORS 105.555, 431.175 and 453.855 to 453.912.
(3) If a license renewal  application and fee is not received by the authority within 15 days after
the expiration of the license, a penalty of $100 shall be added and collected.
(4) The fees collected under this section  shall be paid into the State Treasury and deposited in
the General Fund to the credit of the Public Health Account. Such moneys are continuously appro-
priated to the Oregon Health Authority to pay the  authority’s expenses in administering the pro-
visions of ORS 105.555, 431.175 and 453.855 to 453.912.
(5) Subject to prior approval by the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services [ and a report
to the Emergency Board prior to adopting the fee ], any fee or change  thereto  shall be within the
budget authorized by the Legislative Assembly as that budget may be modified by the Emergency
Board.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 459.236 is amended to read:
459.236. (1) In addition to the permit fees provided in ORS 459.235, upon prior  approval by the
Oregon Department of Administrative Services [ and a report to  the Emergency Board prior to
adopting the fees ], there is imposed a fee on all:
(a) Disposal sites that receive domestic solid waste, building demolition or construction wastes,
land clearing debris, waste tires or solid waste  generated outside the state, for final disposal or
destruction; and
(b) Persons who transport  solid waste out of the State of Oregon for final disposal or destruction
to a disposal site that receives domestic solid  waste, building demolition or construction wastes,
land clearing debris or waste tires.
(2) The amount raised under subsection (1)  of this section shall be up to $1 million per year,
based on the estimated tonnage or the actual tonnage, if known,  received at the site or transported
out of state for final disposal or destruction  and any other similar or related factors the Environ-
mental Quality Commission finds appropriate. Such fees  shall be within the budget authorized by the
Legislative Assembly as that budget may be modified by the Emergency Board.
(3) For solid waste delivered to a disposal site owned and operated by a metropolitan service
district, the fee imposed under subsection (1)  of this section shall be levied on the district, not the
disposal site.
(4) Before transporting or arranging for transport of solid waste out of the State of Oregon to
a disposal site that receives domestic solid waste, a person shall notify the Department of  Environ-
mental Quality in writing.
(5)(a) A local government unit that franchises or licenses a domestic solid waste site shall  allow
the disposal site to pass through the amount of the fees established by the commission in  subsection
(1) of this section to the users of the site.
(b) If a disposal site that receives domestic solid waste passes through all  or a portion of the
fees established by the commission in subsection (1) of  this section to a solid waste collector who
uses the site,  a local government unit that franchises or licenses the collection of solid waste shall
allow the franchisee or licensee to include the amount of the fee in the collection service rate.
(6) Except as provided in subsection (7) of this  section, moneys collected under this section shall
be deposited in the Orphan Site Account created under ORS 465.381 to be used  to pay the costs of
removal or remedial action of  hazardous substances, in excess of the maximum amount collected
under ORS 459.311 at:
(a) Solid waste disposal sites owned or operated by a local government unit; or
(b) Privately  owned or operated solid waste disposal sites that receive or received domestic solid
waste for which the department determines  the responsible party is unknown, unwilling or unable
to undertake any portion or phase of a removal or remedial action.
(7) The moneys collected under this section, or proceeds of any bond sale  under ORS 468.195 for
which moneys collected  under this section are pledged for repayment shall be made available to a
local government unit to pay removal or remedial action costs at a site if:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1049 (SB 1049-A) Page 5
(a) The local government unit is responsible for conducting removal or remedial  action under
ORS 465.260; and
(b) The local government unit repays any moneys equal to  the amount that may be raised by the
charge imposed under ORS 459.311 and interest on such moneys, in  accordance with an agreement
between the local government unit and the department. A  local government unit is not required to
repay the first $100,000 the local government unit expends on removal or remedial action.
(8) As used in this section:
(a) “Domestic solid waste” has the meaning given that term in ORS 459A.100.
(b) “Person” does not include an individual who transports the individual’s own residential  solid
waste to a disposal site located out of the state.
(c) “Removal” and “remedial action” have the meanings given those terms in ORS 465.200.
SECTION 11.
 ORS 459.305 is amended to read:
459.305. (1) Except as otherwise provided by rules adopted by the Environmental Quality  Com-
mission under subsection (4) of this section, a disposal site may not  accept solid waste generated
outside the county  in which the disposal site is located unless the Department of Environmental
Quality certifies or, for waste that originates outside Oregon in an  amount exceeding 75,000 tons
annually from a single source  generator or wasteshed, the disposal site operator demonstrates to the
department, that  the person responsible for solid waste management in the area from which the solid
waste originates has implemented an opportunity to recycle that:
(a) For waste originating outside Oregon, achieves either a recovery rate  equivalent to that
achieved in a comparable county in Oregon or a recycling and waste  prevention program equivalent
to the opportunity to recycle in ORS  459A.005 (1)(a) and (2) and the program elements in ORS
459A.007; and
(b) For waste originating inside Oregon, meets the requirements of ORS 459.250 and 459A.005
to 459A.085.
(2) The commission shall adopt rules to establish a program for certification of recycling pro-
grams established by a person in order to comply with  the requirement of subsection (1) of this
section. A contract or agreement for the disposal of solid waste  made between an owner or operator
of a disposal site and a person does not  affect the authority of the commission to establish or modify
the requirements established under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) For each area outside the state from which a disposal site  receives solid waste, the disposal
site has two years after first accepting solid waste from the area to  demonstrate how the area
complies with the requirements of subsection (1) of  this section. The disposal site operator shall
provide written notice to the department prior to first accepting solid waste  from outside the state.
The requirements of this subsection apply only to contracts entered into after September 9, 1995.
(4) The commission shall establish by rule  the amount of solid waste that may be accepted from
outside the county in which the disposal site is located before the person must comply with  the re-
quirements set forth in subsection (1) of this section.
(5) Subject to  prior approval of the Oregon Department of Administrative Services [ and a report
to the Emergency Board prior to adopting the fee ], and  within the budget authorized by the Legisla-
tive Assembly as that budget may be modified by the  Emergency Board, the Department of Envi-
ronmental Quality may  establish a certification fee in accordance with ORS 468.065. The fees may
not exceed the cost of the program.
(6) The certification requirement under subsection (1) of this  section does not apply to a person
implementing a waste reduction program under ORS 459.055.
(7) Notwithstanding any other provision of law relating to solid waste disposal, if the laws of
the state of origin prohibit or restrict the  disposal of any kind of solid waste within the state of
origin, the prohibition or restriction also applies to the disposal of the solid waste in Oregon.
SECTION 12.  ORS 465.386 is amended to read:
465.386. (1) Notwithstanding the totals established in ORS  459.236, the Environmental Quality
Commission by rule may increase the total amount to be collected annually  as a fee and deposited
Enrolled Senate Bill 1049 (SB 1049-A) Page 6
into the Orphan Site Account under  ORS 459.236. The commission shall approve an increase if the
commission  determines:
(a) Existing fees being deposited into the Orphan Site Account  are not sufficient to pay debt
service on bonds sold to pay for removal or remedial actions  at sites where the Department of En-
vironmental Quality determines the responsible party  is unknown or is unwilling or unable to
undertake all required removal or remedial action; or
(b) Revenues  from the sale of bonds cannot be used to pay for activities related to removal or
remedial action, and existing fees being deposited into the  Orphan Site Account are not sufficient
to pay for these activities.
(2) The increased amount approved by the commission under subsection (1) of this section:
(a) Shall be no greater than the amount  needed to pay anticipated costs specifically identified
by the Department of Environmental Quality at sites where the  department determines the respon-
sible party is unknown, unwilling  or unable to undertake all required removal or remedial action;
and
(b) Shall be subject to prior approval by the  Oregon Department of Administrative Services [ and
a report to the Emergency Board prior to adopting the fees ] and shall be  within the budget authorized
by the Legislative Assembly as that budget may be  modified by the Emergency Board during the
interim period between sessions.
SECTION 13.
 ORS 480.127 is amended to read:
480.127. (1) Any  person who desires to sell consumer fireworks at retail to individual members
of the general  public for personal use shall apply in writing to the State Fire Marshal for a permit
at least 15  days in advance of the proposed sale. The State Fire Marshal shall issue the permit only
if the State Fire Marshal finds that the applicant is qualified to  conduct the proposed sale and that
the proposed sale will conform  to the provisions of ORS 480.111 to 480.165 and any rules adopted
under ORS 480.111 to 480.165. A  fee may be charged for the permit. Subject to prior approval by
the Oregon Department of Administrative Services  [ and a report to the Emergency Board prior to
adopting the fee ], the amount of the  fee shall be set by rule and shall be adjusted subsequently by
the State Fire Marshal to finance the administrative expenses incurred  under this section and shall
be within the budget authorized by the Legislative Assembly  as that budget may be modified by the
Emergency  Board.
(2) A retail sales permit  issued under this section authorizes the sale of consumer fireworks only
in the year for which the permit is issued during  the period that begins on June 23 and ends on July
6 of the year for which the permit is issued.
(3) A retail sales  permit holder shall store consumer fireworks in accordance with any fire codes
that the State Fire Marshal adopts by rule to  ensure safe storage of those fireworks. The matters
that the State Fire Marshal considers when adopting storage rules for  fireworks may include, but
are not limited to, any United  States Department of Transportation requirements relating to haz-
ardous materials storage.
SECTION 14.  ORS 480.130 is amended to read:
480.130. (1) All persons, municipalities, associations or organizations  or groups of individuals
desiring to sell, discharge, fire off, explode or display fireworks  for a public display, or to sell con-
sumer fireworks to persons who possess  the permit referred to in ORS 480.127, shall apply in writing
to the State Fire Marshal for a permit at least 15 days in advance of the proposed sale  or date of
the display. The State  Fire Marshal, upon receipt of such application, shall determine if the pro-
posed sale or display will conform to law  and any rules promulgated thereunder. If the State Fire
Marshal finds that the applicant is qualified to  conduct such sale or display and that the proposed
sale or display is in accordance with the law and all rules, the State Fire  Marshal shall issue a
permit; otherwise the State Fire Marshal shall refuse to issue it.
(2) The fee for a permit for the public display  of fireworks and each permit for the sale of any
fireworks shall be established by rule by the State Fire Marshal,  subject to prior approval by the
Oregon Department of Administrative Services [ and a report to  the Emergency Board prior to
adopting the fee ], and subsequently shall be adjusted to finance the administrative expenses incurred
Enrolled Senate Bill 1049 (SB 1049-A) Page 7
under this section and shall be  within the budget authorized by the Legislative Assembly as that
budget may be modified by the Emergency Board. All fees collected shall be  deposited to the credit
of the State Fire Marshal Fund.
(3) Sales  permits for fireworks are not valid for more than one year from date of issue. A public
display permit is not valid for more than 10 days from date of  issuance and may authorize only one
fireworks display during that period.
SECTION 15.  ORS 673.685 is amended to read:
673.685. (1) The State Board of Tax Practitioners shall adopt by rule fees for:
(a) Application for examination for a tax consultant’s license.
(b) Application for examination for a tax preparer’s license.
(c) Issuance or renewal of a tax consultant’s license.
(d) Issuance or renewal of a tax preparer’s license.
(e) Issuance or renewal of a tax consultant’s inactive license.
(f) Issuance or renewal of a tax preparer’s inactive license.
(g) Reactivation of a tax  consultant’s inactive license or reactivation of a tax preparer’s inactive
license.
(h) Restoration of lapsed license.
(i) Issuance or replacement of a duplicate license.
(j) Issuance of a replacement or duplicate tax consultant certificate.
(k) Registration or registration renewal  for a sole proprietorship, partnership, corporation or
other legal entity.
(L) Issuance or renewal of a combined  tax consultant’s or tax preparer’s license and registration
for a sole proprietorship, partnership, corporation or other legal entity. Eligibility for a combined
license shall be determined under rules adopted by the board.
(m) Annual registration  of a branch office of a sole proprietorship, partnership, corporation or
other legal entity.
(2) The fees established  by the State Board of Tax Practitioners under this section are subject
to the prior approval  of the Oregon Department of Administrative Services [ and, if their adoption
occurs between regular sessions of the Legislative Assembly, a report to the Emergency Board ]. The
fees may not exceed the cost of administering the regulatory program of the State  Board of Tax
Practitioners pertaining to the purposes for which the fees are  established, as authorized by the
Legislative Assembly within the board’s budget, as that budget may be modified  by the Emergency
Board.
SECTION 16.
 ORS 675.115 is amended to read:
675.115. Subject to prior  approval of the Oregon Department of Administrative Services [ and a
report to the Emergency Board prior to adopting the fees and charges ], the fees and charges estab-
lished under ORS 675.110  shall not exceed the cost of administering the regulatory program of the
Oregon Board of Psychology pertaining to the purpose for which the fee or  charge is established,
as authorized by the  Legislative Assembly within the board’s budget, as the budget may be modified
by the Emergency Board.
SECTION 17.  ORS 675.571 is amended to read:
675.571. (1) The State Board of Licensed Social Workers shall collect fees for:
(a) Examination and reexamination.
(b) An initial authorization to practice regulated social work.
(c) Renewal of an authorization to practice regulated social work.
(d) Delinquent renewal of an authorization to practice regulated social work.
(2) Fees collected under subsection (1) of this section shall  be deposited in the State Board of
Licensed Social Workers Account established under ORS 675.597 and shall be used to  defray the
expenses of the board.
(3) Subject to  prior approval of the Oregon Department of Administrative Services [ and a report
to the Emergency Board prior to adopting the  fees and charges ], the fees and charges established
under this section may not exceed the cost of administering the regulatory program  pertaining to
Enrolled Senate Bill 1049 (SB 1049-A) Page 8
the purpose for which  the fee or charge is established, as authorized by the Legislative Assembly
within the budget of the State Board of Licensed Social  Workers, as the budget may be modified by
the Emergency Board.
(4) The State Board of Licensed Social Workers may impose a delinquent renewal fee for an
authorization to practice regulated social work if  the application for renewal is not filed and ac-
cepted by the renewal date established  by the board by rule, but is filed and accepted within 30 days
of the renewal date.  An authorization to practice regulated social work is lapsed if an application
for renewal is not filed and accepted within 30 days of the renewal date.
(5) Fees collected under this section are nonrefundable.
SECTION 18.
 ORS 675.785 is amended to read:
675.785. The Oregon  Board of Licensed Professional Counselors and Therapists has the following
powers and duties:
(1) In accordance with the applicable provisions of ORS chapter 183, the board shall  adopt rules
necessary for the administration of the laws the board is charged with administering.
(2) Subject to applicable provisions of the State Personnel Relations Law, the board  may ap-
point, prescribe the duties and fix the compensation of employees  of the board necessary to carry
out the duties of the board.
(3)(a) The board may impose nonrefundable fees in an amount set by rule for the following:
[(a)] (A)  License application.
[(b)] (B)  First issuance of a license.
[(c)] (C) Renewal of a license.
[(d)] (D)  Late filing of a license renewal.
[(e)] (E)  Renewal of registration as an associate.
[(f)] (F)  Examinations. Examination fees may  not exceed the costs incurred in administering the
particular  examination.
(b) Fees established under this subsection are subject to prior approval of the Oregon  Depart-
ment of Administrative Services [ and a report to the Emergency Board prior to adopting the fees ] and
must be  within the budget authorized by the Legislative Assembly as that budget may be modified
by the Emergency Board.
(4) The [ board] Oregon Board of Licensed Professional Counselors and Therapists  shall:
(a) Maintain a  register of all current licensed professional counselors and marriage and family
therapists.
(b) Annually  publish a directory listing all current licensed professional counselors and marriage
and family  therapists. The directory must be available to the public, and the board may collect a
publication fee for the directory.
(5) The board shall:
(a) Investigate alleged violations of the provisions of ORS 675.715 to 675.835 or rules  adopted
under authority of the board.
(b) Establish procedures to review the complaints of clients  of licensees of the board. Upon re-
ceipt of a complaint under ORS 675.715 to  675.835 against a licensed or unlicensed person, the board
shall conduct an investigation as described under ORS 676.165.
(6) The board shall report  to the Legislative Assembly concerning the activities of the board
during the preceding biennium.
(7) The board shall form standards committees to establish, examine and pass on the qualifica-
tions of applicants to practice professional counseling or marriage and family therapy in  this state,
including standards and requirements for continuing education and supervision,  as appropriate. The
standards committee for professional counselors  shall be made up of the professional counselors on
the board, the faculty member and the public member. The standards committee for marriage and
family therapists shall be made up of the marriage and family members of the board,  the faculty
member and the public member.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1049 (SB 1049-A) Page 9
(8) The board shall grant licenses to applicants  who qualify to practice professional counseling
or marriage and family therapy in this state upon compliance with  ORS 675.715 to 675.835 and the
rules of the board.
(9) The board may administer oaths, take depositions, defray legal expenses and  issue subpoenas
to compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of documents or written information nec-
essary to carry out ORS 675.715 to 675.835.
(10) The board may adopt a seal to be affixed to all licenses.
(11) The board shall  adopt a code of ethics for licensees. The board may use the ethical codes
of professional counseling and  marriage and family therapy associations as models for the code es-
tablished by the board.
(12) The board may set academic  and training standards necessary under ORS 675.715 to
675.835, including, but  not limited to, the adoption of rules to establish semester hour equivalents
for qualification for licensing where quarter hours are required under ORS 675.715 to 675.835.
(13) The board shall require the applicant for a professional  counselor license or a marriage and
family therapy license to receive a passing score on  an examination of competency in counseling
or marriage and family therapy. The examination may be the  examination given nationally to certify
counselors, or in the case of  marriage and family therapy, the examination approved by the Asso-
ciation of Marital and Family Therapy Regulatory Boards.
(14) For the purpose  of requesting a state or nationwide criminal records check under ORS
181A.195, the board may require the fingerprints of a person who is:
(a) Applying for a license that is issued by the board;
(b) Applying for renewal of a license that is issued by the board; or
(c) Under investigation by the board.
(15) The board shall prescribe, in consultation with the Oregon Board  of Psychology, the duties
of the Director of the Mental Health Regulatory Agency.
SECTION 19.
 ORS 676.625 is amended to read:
676.625. (1) The Health Licensing Office shall establish by rule and shall collect fees and charges
to carry out the office’s responsibilities under ORS  676.560 to 676.625, 676.850 and 676.992 and any
responsibility imposed on the office pertaining to the  boards, councils and programs administered
and regulated by the office pursuant to ORS 676.565.
(2) The Health Licensing Office Account is established separate  and distinct from the General
Fund. The account shall consist of the moneys  credited to the account by the Legislative Assembly.
All moneys in the  account are continuously appropriated to and shall be used by the office for
payment of expenses of the office in carrying out the duties, functions and obligations of the  office,
and for payment of the expenses  of the boards, councils and programs administered and regulated
by the office pursuant to ORS 676.565. The office  shall keep a record of all moneys credited to the
account and report the source from which the moneys are derived  and the activity of each board,
council or program that generated the moneys.
(3) Subject to  prior approval of the Oregon Department of Administrative Services [ and a report
to the Emergency Board prior to establishing  fees and charges credited to the account ], the fees and
charges may not exceed the cost of administering the office and  the boards, councils and programs
within the office, as authorized by the Legislative Assembly within the  office’s budget, as the budget
may be modified by the Emergency Board.
(4) All moneys credited to the account pursuant to ORS 676.576 and  676.806, and moneys cred-
ited to the account from other office and program fees established by the office by  rule, are con-
tinuously appropriated to the office for  carrying out the duties, functions and powers of the office
under ORS 676.560 to 676.625, 676.806, 676.850 and 676.992.
(5) The moneys received from civil penalties assessed under ORS  676.992 shall be deposited and
accounted for as are other moneys received by the office and shall be  for the administration and
enforcement of the statutes governing  the boards, councils and programs administered by the office.
SECTION 19a.  ORS 676.625,  as amended by section 14, chapter 92, Oregon Laws 2022, is
amended to read:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1049 (SB 1049-A) Page 10
676.625. (1) The Health Licensing Office shall establish by rule and shall collect fees and charges
to carry out the office’s responsibilities under ORS  676.560 to 676.625, 676.850 and 676.992 and any
responsibility imposed on the office pertaining to the  boards, councils and programs administered
and regulated by the office pursuant to ORS 676.565.
(2) The Health Licensing Office Account  is established separate and distinct from the General
Fund. The account shall consist of the moneys  credited to the account by the Legislative Assembly.
All moneys in the account are continuously appropriated to and shall be used by  the office for
payment of expenses of the office in carrying out the duties, functions and obligations of the  office,
and for payment of the expenses of the boards, councils  and programs administered and regulated
by the office pursuant to ORS 676.565. The office shall keep  a record of all moneys credited to the
account and report the source from which  the moneys are derived and the activity of each board,
council or program that generated the moneys.
(3) Subject to  prior approval of the Oregon Department of Administrative Services [ and a report
to the Emergency Board prior to establishing fees and charges credited  to the account ], the fees and
charges may not exceed the cost  of administering the office and the boards, councils and programs
within the office, as authorized by the Legislative Assembly within the  office’s budget, as the budget
may be modified by the Emergency Board.
(4) All moneys credited to  the account pursuant to ORS 676.576 and 676.806, and moneys cred-
ited to the account  from other office and program fees established by the office by rule, are con-
tinuously appropriated to the office for carrying out the duties, functions  and powers of the office
under ORS 676.560 to 676.625, 676.806, 676.850 and 676.992.
(5) The moneys received from civil penalties assessed under ORS 676.992  and section 7, chapter
92, Oregon Laws 2022,  shall be deposited and accounted for as are other moneys received by the
office and shall  be for the administration and enforcement of the statutes governing the boards,
councils and programs administered by the office.
SECTION 20.  ORS 677.265 is amended to read:
677.265. In addition to  any other powers granted by this chapter, the Oregon Medical Board
may:
(1) Adopt necessary and proper rules for administration of this chapter  including but not limited
to:
(a) Establishing fees and charges to carry out its legal responsibilities, subject to  prior approval
by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services [ and a report to the Emergency Board  prior
to adopting the fees and charges ]. The fees and  charges shall be within the budget authorized by the
Legislative Assembly as that budget may  be modified by the Emergency Board. The fees and charges
established under this section may not exceed the  cost of administering the program or the purpose
for which the fee or charge is established, as authorized by the Legislative  Assembly for the Oregon
Medical Board’s budget, or  as modified by the Emergency Board or future sessions of the Legislative
Assembly.
(b) Establishing  standards and tests to determine the moral, intellectual, educational, scientific,
technical and professional qualifications required of applicants for licenses under this chapter.
(c) Enforcing the provisions of this chapter and exercising general supervision over the  practice
of medicine and podiatry within this state. In determining  whether to discipline a licensee for a
standard of  care violation, the Oregon Medical Board shall determine whether the licensee used that
degree of care, skill and diligence that is used  by ordinarily careful physicians in the same or sim-
ilar circumstances in the community of the physician or a similar community.
(2) Issue, deny, suspend and revoke licenses  and limited licenses, assess costs of proceedings and
fines and place licensees on probation as provided in this chapter.
(3) Use the gratuitous services and facilities of private organizations  to receive the assistance
and recommendations of the organizations in administering this chapter.
(4) Make its personnel  and facilities available to other regulatory agencies of this state, or other
bodies interested in the development  and improvement of the practice of medicine or podiatry in this
Enrolled Senate Bill 1049 (SB 1049-A) Page 11
state, upon terms and conditions  for reimbursement as are agreed to by the Oregon Medical Board
and the other agency or body.
(5) Appoint examiners, who need not be members of the Oregon  Medical Board, and employ or
contract with the American Public Health Association or  the National Board of Medical Examiners
or other organizations, agencies and persons to prepare examination  questions and score examina-
tion papers.
(6) Determine the schools, colleges, universities, institutions and training acceptable in  con-
nection with licensing under this chapter. All residency, internship and  other training programs
carried on in this state by any hospital, institution or medical facility shall be subject to  approval
by the Oregon Medical Board. The board shall  accept the approval by the American Osteopathic
Association or the American Medical Association in lieu of approval by the board.
(7) Prescribe the time, place,  method, manner, scope and subjects of examinations under this
chapter.
(8) Prescribe all forms that it considers appropriate for the  purposes of this chapter, and require
the submission of photographs and relevant personal history data by  applicants for licensure under
this chapter.
(9) For the purpose of requesting  a state or nationwide criminal records check under ORS
181A.195, require the fingerprints of a person who is:
(a) Applying for a license that is issued by the board;
(b) Applying for renewal of a license that is issued by the board; or
(c) Under investigation by the board.
(10) Administer oaths, issue notices and subpoenas in the name of  the board, enforce subpoenas
in the manner authorized by ORS 183.440, hold hearings  and perform such other acts as are rea-
sonably necessary to carry out its duties under this chapter.
SECTION 21.
 ORS 678.410 is amended to read:
678.410. (1) The Oregon State  Board of Nursing may establish and collect fees necessary to
carry out the provisions of ORS 678.010 to 678.448.
(2) Fees are nonrefundable.
(3)(a) The board shall obtain approval from the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services
[and submit a report to the Emergency Board ] prior to establishing fees under this section.
(b) A fee established and  collected under this section may not exceed the cost of administering
a regulatory program for which the fee is established and collected,  as authorized by the Legislative
Assembly within the Oregon State Board of Nursing budget, subject to modification by  the Emer-
gency Board.
(c) If federal or other funds are available to offset costs of administering the program, fees shall
be established based on net costs to the  state but may not exceed $75 per biennium for a nursing
assistant certification.
SECTION 22.
 ORS 679.120 is amended to read:
679.120. (1) The Oregon Board of Dentistry may impose application fees for the following:
(a) Examinations, which may  differ for general dentistry, foreign school graduate and specialty
examinations.
(b) Biennial dentist license, active.
(c) Biennial dentist license, inactive.
(d) Permits and certificates.
(e) Delinquency.
(2) Subject to  prior approval of the Oregon Department of Administrative Services [ and a report
to the Emergency Board prior to adopting the fees  and charges ], the fees and charges established
under this section and  ORS 680.075 shall not exceed the costs of administering the regulatory pro-
gram of the board, as authorized by the  Legislative Assembly within the board budget, as the budget
may be modified by the Emergency Board.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1049 (SB 1049-A) Page 12
(3)(a) The [ board] Oregon Board of Dentistry  may waive the  payment of the license fee in the
case of any licensee who furnishes satisfactory evidence that the licensee has discontinued  the ac-
tual practice of dentistry because of retirement.
(b) Application to reinstate a  license retired under paragraph (a) of this subsection or to convert
an inactive status license  to an active status license shall be made in accordance with the rules of
the board and with the submission of the license  fee prescribed for such license; provided, however,
that if more than one year has expired since  the license was retired or inactivated, satisfactory
evidence of operative competence must be submitted to the board.
(4) Every dentist shall advise the board within 30 days of any change of address.
(5) Each dentist must renew the dentist’s license every two  years through submitting a renewal
application and paying the license fee.
(6) Dentists  licensed in even-numbered years must renew by March 31 of each even-numbered
year. Dentists licensed in odd-numbered years must renew by March 31 of each  odd-numbered year.
(7) A reasonable charge may be made in the event  that the license fee or renewal application
is more than 10 days delinquent.
(8) Fees paid are not refundable.
SECTION 23.
 ORS 679.615 is amended to read:
679.615. (1) The Oregon Board of Dentistry may impose nonrefundable fees for the following:
(a) Application for licensure;
(b) Examinations;
(c) Biennial dental therapy licenses, both active and inactive;
(d) Licensure renewal fees;
(e) Permits; and
(f) Delinquency.
(2) Subject to  prior approval of the Oregon Department of Administrative Services [ and a report
to the Emergency Board prior to adopting fees and charges ], the fees and  charges established under
ORS 679.600 to 679.630 may not exceed the cost of administering ORS 679.600 to 679.630 as author-
ized by the Legislative Assembly within the Oregon Board of Dentistry budget  and as modified by
the Emergency Board.
(3)(a) The Oregon Board of Dentistry may waive a license fee for a licensee who provides  to the
board satisfactory evidence that the licensee has discontinued  the practice of dental therapy be-
cause of retirement.
(b) A licensee described in this  subsection may apply to the board for reinstatement of the li-
cense pursuant to rules adopted by the board. An application under this paragraph must  include a
fee. If the licensee has  been retired or inactive for more than one year from the date of application,
the licensee shall  include with the application satisfactory evidence of clinical competence, as de-
termined by the board.
(4)(a) A license to practice dental therapy is  valid for two years and may be renewed. A licensee
shall submit to the board an application for renewal and payment of the fee.
(b) A dental therapist issued a license in an even-numbered year must apply  for renewal by
September 30 of each even-numbered year thereafter. A dental therapist issued a license in  an odd-
numbered year must apply for renewal by September 30 of each odd-numbered year thereafter.
(c) The board may  charge a reasonable fee if the application for renewal or the fee is submitted
more than 10 days delinquent.
(5) A dental therapist shall inform the board of a change  of the dental therapist’s address within
30 days of the change.
SECTION 24.
 ORS 680.075 is amended to read:
680.075. (1) The Oregon Board of Dentistry may impose application fees for the following:
(a) Examinations;
(b) Biennial dental hygiene license, active;
(c) Biennial dental hygiene license, inactive;
(d) Permits and certificates; and
Enrolled Senate Bill 1049 (SB 1049-A) Page 13
(e) Delinquency.
(2) Subject to  prior approval of the Oregon Department of Administrative Services [ and a report
to the Emergency Board prior to adopting the fees  and charges ], the fees and charges established
under this  section and ORS chapter 679 shall not exceed the costs of administering the regulatory
program of the board as authorized by the Legislative Assembly within the board budget, as the
budget may be modified by the Emergency Board.
(3)(a) The [ board] Oregon Board of Dentistry  may waive the  payment of the license fee in the
case of any  licensee who furnishes satisfactory evidence that the licensee has discontinued the ac-
tual practice of dental hygiene because of retirement.
(b) Application to reinstate a  license retired under paragraph (a) of this subsection or to convert
an inactive status license  to an active status license shall be made in accordance with the rules of
the board and with the submission of the license  fee prescribed for such license; provided, however,
that if more than one year has expired since  the license was retired or inactivated, satisfactory
evidence of clinical competence must be submitted to the board.
(4) Every dental hygienist shall advise the board within 30 days of any change of address.
(5) Each dental hygienist must renew the hygienist’s license every two  years through submitting
a renewal application and paying the license fee.
(6) Dental hygienists licensed in even-numbered years must renew by September 30 of  each
even-numbered year. Dental hygienists licensed in odd-numbered years  must renew by September 30
of each odd-numbered year.
(7) A reasonable charge may be made in the event  that the license fee or renewal application
is more than 10 days delinquent.
(8) Fees paid are not refundable.
SECTION 25.
 ORS 685.100 is amended to read:
685.100. (1) Upon approval of an application  for a licensure, the Oregon Board of Naturopathic
Medicine shall issue a license certificate that shall be displayed at all times in the office  of the
person to whom it was issued while the license is active.
(2) A person holding an active license issued under this chapter may apply to  the board for li-
cense renewal. A completed renewal application consists of:
(a) A completed  board renewal form containing any information required by the board to de-
termine the applicant’s eligibility for license renewal;
(b) Proof of compliance with continuing education requirements set by the board; and
(c) Payment of the active license renewal fee established by  the board under subsection (8) of
this section.
(3) Failure to submit a completed renewal application annually by December 31, or by  such date
as may be specified by board rule, results in the  lapse of the license. A lapsed license may be re-
stored by the board upon receipt, not more than 30 days after  the license lapses, of a completed
renewal application and payment of the restoration fee under subsection (8) of this section.
(4) A license that has lapsed for more than one month may be restored by  the board upon pay-
ment of the restoration fee established by  the board and submission of a completed renewal appli-
cation and any other information required by the board.
(5) A person holding an active license under this chapter may convert the license to  inactive
status by meeting the requirements set by rule of the  board and paying any required fees. A person
holding a license issued under this chapter who is at least 70 years of age and retired from the
practice of naturopathic medicine may convert the license to retired status by meeting the  require-
ments set by rule of the board and paying any required fees.
(6)(a) A person who chooses to allow a license to become inactive may file a  written application
to reactivate a license that has been inactive  for one year or less by paying the restoration fee and
the renewal fee for an active license and demonstrating compliance with ORS 685.102. A fee  paid
to place the license in inactive status may not be  credited toward payment of the renewal fee for
an active license. The board may prorate the renewal fee.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1049 (SB 1049-A) Page 14
(b) A person  who chooses to allow a license to become inactive may file a written application
to reactivate a license that has been inactive for more than one year  by paying the renewal fee for
an active license  and demonstrating compliance with the continuing education requirement set by
rule of the board under ORS 685.102 (6). The board may prorate the renewal fee.
(7) The  executive director of the board shall issue a renewal notice to each person holding a
license under this chapter at least 60 days before the renewal application is due.
(8) The board shall assess fees for:
(a) An initial license.
(b) Examination.
(c) Renewal of an active license.
(d) Yearly renewal of an inactive or retired license.
(e) Restoration of an inactive, lapsed or revoked license.
(f) A certificate of special competency in natural childbirth.
(g) A duplicate license.
(h) A wall certificate.
(i) Copies of public documents, mailing labels, lists and diskettes.
(9) Subject to  prior approval of the Oregon Department of Administrative Services [ and a report
to the Emergency Board prior to adopting the  fees and charges ], the fees and charges established
under this section may not exceed the  cost of administering the regulatory program of the board
pertaining to the purpose for which  the fee or charge is established, as authorized by the Legislative
Assembly within the board’s budget, as the budget may be modified by the Emergency Board.
SECTION 26.
 ORS 686.255 is amended to read:
686.255. (1) The  Oregon State Veterinary Medical Examining Board may impose fees for the
following:
(a) License or permit issuance or renewal.
(b) Examination for licensure.
(c) Temporary license.
(d) Duplicate license.
(e) Veterinary technician license.
(f) Delinquent renewal.
(g) Application and certification fee for certified euthanasia technicians and employers.
(h) Verification of a license  of a veterinarian applying for license under reciprocity with another
state.
(2) Subject to  prior approval of the Oregon Department of Administrative Services [ and a report
to the Emergency Board prior to adopting the fees  and charges ], the fees and charges established
under this section shall not  exceed the cost of administering the regulatory program of the board
pertaining to the purpose for which  the fee or charge is established, as authorized by the Legislative
Assembly within the board’s budget, as the budget may be modified by the Emergency Board.
SECTION 27.
 ORS 686.600 is amended to read:
686.600. (1) A veterinary facility may not offer  services related to the practice of veterinary
medicine, surgery or dentistry, as described in ORS 686.030, unless the veterinary facility:
(a) Registers with the Oregon State Veterinary Medical Examining Board; and
(b) Designates a veterinarian licensed under this chapter to be responsible for ensuring that the
veterinary facility is in compliance with this section and rules adopted by the board under this
section.
(2) The board shall adopt rules establishing:
(a) The form and manner of registering under this section;
(b) The form and manner of renewing a registration under this section;
(c) Fees for registering or renewing a registration under this section; and
(d) Health and safety standards for veterinary facilities.
(3) The board may inspect a  veterinary facility to ensure that the veterinary facility is in com-
pliance with this section and rules adopted under this section.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1049 (SB 1049-A) Page 15
(4) Subject to the provisions of ORS chapter 183, the board may suspend or revoke the  regis-
tration of a veterinary facility if the veterinary facility changes ownership, does  not retain a des-
ignated veterinarian with the responsibilities described in subsection (1)(b) of this  section or fails
to comply with this section or any rule adopted by the board under this section.
(5) Subject to  prior approval of the Oregon Department of Administrative Services [ and a report
to the Emergency Board prior to adopting the fees ], the  fees established under subsection (2)(c) of this
section may not exceed the cost of administering this section or rules  adopted under this section,
as authorized by the Legislative Assembly within the Oregon State  Veterinary Medical Examining
Board’s budget, as the budget may be modified by the Emergency Board.
SECTION 28.  ORS 692.160 is amended to read:
692.160. (1) The fees that may be charged under this chapter are:
(a) A  fee covering requests for applications for a funeral service practitioner license, an
embalmer license, a death  care consultant license, a funeral establishment license, an immediate
disposition company license, a certificate of authority for a cemetery, a certificate  of authority for
a crematorium, a certificate of authority for any other  facility for final disposition of human re-
mains, registration as a funeral  service practitioner trainee, registration as an embalmer trainee, a
certificate  of  removal registration, a license as a reciprocal funeral service practitioner or a license
as a reciprocal embalmer. The application fee shall be accompanied by an additional fee for  each
principal of a funeral establishment,  immediate disposition company, cemetery, crematorium or other
facility for final disposition of human remains.
(b) A fee covering  the renewal of a license for a funeral establishment, a license for an imme-
diate disposition company, a certificate of authority for a crematorium  or a certificate of authority
for any other facility for final disposition of human remains.
(c) A fee covering the renewal of a funeral service practitioner license, an embalmer license  or
a death care consultant license.
(d) A fee for renewal of a combination funeral service practitioner and embalmer license.
(e) A fee for renewal of the registration of a  funeral service practitioner trainee or an embalmer
trainee.
(f) An examination fee for a funeral service practitioner license, an embalmer license or a death
care consultant license.
(g) A fee covering the renewal of a certificate of authority for a cemetery.
(h) A fee covering the reinstatement of a lapsed license, certificate of authority  or registration.
(i) A fee for reissuing a license, registration or certificate of  authority as provided in ORS
692.148.
(j) Fees for copying any public record maintained by the State Mortuary and Cemetery  Board,
for documents distributed by the board and postage for mailing any copies or documents.
(2) All licenses granted under this chapter to funeral  service practitioners, embalmers and death
care consultants expire  on January 1 in even-numbered years or on such date as may be specified
by rule of the State Mortuary and Cemetery Board. All licenses  or certificates of authority granted
under this chapter to operators of funeral establishments, to operators of immediate disposition
companies, to operators of cemeteries, to operators of  crematoriums or to operators of other facili-
ties for final disposition of human remains expire on January  1 in odd-numbered years or on such
date as may be specified by board rule.
(3) The board shall mail to each licensed funeral service practitioner, to each licensed embalmer,
to each licensed death care consultant, to each licensed operator of a  funeral establishment or im-
mediate disposition company and to  each cemetery, crematorium and other facility for final dispo-
sition of human remains holding a certificate of authority under ORS 692.275, addressed  to the
licensee or certificate holder  at the licensee’s or certificate holder’s last-known address, a notice
that the renewal fee  is due and payable and that if the fee is not paid by the renewal date the li-
cense or certificate of authority shall lapse. The board shall mail the notice at least  60 days before
the license or certificate of authority expires.  The board may impose continuing education require-
ments as a prerequisite for relicensure.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1049 (SB 1049-A) Page 16
(4) Subject to  prior approval of the Oregon Department of Administrative Services [ and a report
to the Emergency Board prior to adopting the fees  and charges ], the fees and charges established
under this section shall not exceed the cost of administering the regulatory program  of the State
Mortuary and Cemetery Board pertaining to the purpose for which  the fee or charge is established,
as authorized by the  Legislative Assembly within the board’s budget, as the budget may be modified
by the Emergency Board.
SECTION 29.  ORS 701.238 is amended to read:
701.238. (1) Before July 1 of each year, the Construction Contractors Board  shall determine the
amounts of the fees to be  charged for applications under ORS 701.056 for the issuance or renewal
of contractor licenses. The fee amounts  are subject to prior approval of the Oregon Department of
Administrative  Services  [ and a report to the Emergency Board prior to adoption ]. The fee amounts
shall be within the budget authorized by the Legislative Assembly as that budget may be  modified
by the Emergency Board. The fee amounts  established under this section may not exceed the cost
of administering the regulatory  program of the [ board] Construction Contractors Board  under this
chapter, as authorized by the Legislative Assembly within  the board’s budget, as the budget may be
modified by the Emergency Board.
(2) The amounts of the fees determined by the  [board] Construction Contractors Board  under
subsection (1) of this section shall be effective as set by rule.
SECTION 30.  ORS 731.804 is amended to read:
731.804. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, each authorized insurer doing business
in this state shall pay assessments that the Director of the Department of Consumer and  Business
Services  determines  are necessary to support the legislatively authorized budget of the Department
of Consumer  and Business Services with respect to functions of the department under the Insurance
Code. The director shall determine the assessments according to one or  more percentage rates es-
tablished by the director by  rule. The director shall specify in the rule when assessments shall be
made and payments shall be due. The premium-weighted average of the percentage rates  may not
exceed nine-hundredths of one percent  of the gross amount of premiums received by an insurer or
the insurer’s  insurance producers from and under the insurer’s policies covering direct domestic
risks, after deducting the amount of  return premiums paid and the amount of dividend payments
made to policyholders  with respect to such policies. In the case of reciprocal insurers, the amount
of savings paid or credited to the accounts  of subscribers shall be deducted from the gross amount
of premiums. In establishing the percentage rate or rates, the director shall use the most  recent
premium data approved by the  director. In establishing the amounts to be collected under this sub-
section, the director shall take into consideration the expenses of the department  for administering
the Insurance Code  and the fees collected under subsection (2) of this section. When the director
establishes two or more percentage rates:
(a) Each rate shall be based  on such expenses of the department ascribed by the director to the
line of insurance for which the rate is established.
(b) Each rate shall be applied to the gross amount of premium received by an insurer or  its in-
surance producers for the applicable line of insurance as provided in this subsection.
(2) The director  may collect fees for specific services provided by the department under the In-
surance Code according to a schedule of fees established by the director by rule.  The director may
collect such fees in advance. In establishing the schedule for  fees, the director shall take into con-
sideration the cost of each service for which a fee is imposed.
(3)(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of ORS 743A.067 (7)(e) and 743A.067 (9), for the  purpose
of mitigating inequity  in the health insurance market, the director may assess a fee on any insurer
that offers a health benefit plan, as defined in ORS  743B.005, that is exempt from a provision of ORS
chapter 743A or  other provision of the Insurance Code that requires specified coverage by health
benefit plans.
(b) Any fees collected under paragraph (a) of this subsection must  be the actuarial equivalent
of costs attributed to the provision  and administration of the required coverage by an insurer that
is not exempt.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1049 (SB 1049-A) Page 17
(c) Nothing  in this section limits the authority of the director to enforce the provisions of ORS
chapter 743A if an insurer unlawfully fails to comply.
(d) Notwithstanding ORS 646A.628, fees paid in accordance  with paragraph (a) of this subsection
shall be deposited in the General Fund to become available for general governmental expenses.
(4) Establishment and amendment of the schedule of fees under subsection (2) of this section  are
subject to prior approval of the Oregon Department  of Administrative Services [ and a report to the
Emergency Board prior to adopting the fees ] and shall be within the budget  authorized by the Leg-
islative Assembly as that budget may be modified by the Emergency Board.
(5) The director may not collect an  assessment under subsection (1) of this section from any of
the following persons:
(a) A fraternal benefit society complying with ORS chapter 748.
(b) Any person or class of persons designated by the director by rule.
(6) The director may not collect an assessment under subsection (1)  of this section with respect
to premiums received from any of the following policies:
(a) Workers’ compensation insurance policies.
(b) Wet marine and transportation insurance policies.
(c) Any category of policies designated by the director by rule.
SECTION 31.
 ORS 776.355 is amended to read:
776.355. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, each licensee  under this chapter
shall pay an annual license fee to the Oregon Board of  Maritime Pilots not to exceed the amount
established under ORS 776.115. Subject to prior approval of the Oregon  Department of Administra-
tive Services [ and a report to the Emergency Board prior to adopting  the fee ], the amount of the fee
shall be adjusted by the Oregon Board of Maritime Pilots to finance costs as  defined by the
legislatively approved budget, as it may be modified by the Emergency Board.
(2) The [ board] Oregon Board of Maritime  Pilots  by rule may establish reduced license fees
for those individuals who engage in  pilotage activities on less than a full-time basis. However, in
no event shall the fee be less than $50.
SECTION 32.  ORS 776.800 is amended to read:
776.800. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, each licensee  under this chapter
shall collect a board operations fee from each vessel using the services of a licensee. The purpose
of the fee is to allow the Oregon Board of Maritime  Pilots to carry out its duties, functions and
powers under this chapter. The fee may not exceed the amount described in ORS 776.810.
(2) The fee  described in subsection (1) of this section shall be collected in the following manner:
(a) For vessels entering or leaving the Columbia River, licensees for the Columbia River bar
pilotage ground shall collect  the fee from inbound vessels and licensees for the Columbia and
Willamette River pilotage ground shall collect the fee from outbound vessels.
(b) For vessels entering or leaving Coos Bay or Yaquina Bay, licensees for the Coos Bay  or
Yaquina Bay pilotage ground shall collect the fee from inbound and outbound vessels.
(3) The board shall prescribe the procedures for collecting and remitting the fee imposed under
this section.
(4) Each quarter the board shall review the amount of the fee. If the board determines  that the
fee should be adjusted, then the board may adjust the fee subject to[ :]
[(a)] prior approval of the Oregon Department of Administrative Services .[; and ]
[(b) A report to the Emergency Board. ]
TRANSFERS FOR GENERAL GOVERNMENTAL PURPOSES
SECTION 33. Notwithstanding ORS 243.167, the amount of $40,000,000 is transferred from
the Public Employees’ Revolving Fund to the General Fund for general  governmental pur-
poses. The transfer shall be made on May 31, 2025.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1049 (SB 1049-A) Page 18
SECTION 33a. Notwithstanding ORS 243.167, the amount of $50,000,000 is  transferred
from the Public Employees’ Revolving Fund to the Insurance Fund  established under ORS
278.425. The transfer shall be made on May 31, 2025.
SECTION 33b. Notwithstanding ORS 741.102, the amount of $614,635 is transferred from
the Health Insurance Exchange Fund to the General Fund for general governmental pur-
poses. The transfer shall be made on May 31, 2025.
SECTION 34.
Sections 57 and 61, chapter 10, Oregon Laws 2020 (second special session),
are repealed.
SECTION 35. Any actions  or omissions before the effective date of this 2023 Act that
would have been valid if  sections 57 and 61, chapter 10, Oregon Laws 2020 (second special
session), were not enacted into law are validated.
TIDE GATE GRANT PROGRAM
SECTION 36.  Section 22a, chapter 10, Oregon Laws 2020 (second  special session), is amended
to read:
Sec. 22a.  The Tide Gate Grant and Loan  Fund established under section 21 [ of this 2020 second
special session Act ], chapter 10, Oregon Laws 2020 (second special session),  is abolished on June
30, [2023] 2024. Any moneys remaining in the fund on that date shall be transferred to the Admin-
istrative Services Economic Development Fund established under ORS 461.540.
SECTION 37.  Section 23, chapter 10, Oregon  Laws 2020 (second special session), is amended to
read:
Sec. 23.  Sections 21 and 22 [ of this 2020 second special session Act ], chapter 10, Oregon Laws
2020 (second special session),  are repealed on June 30, [ 2023] 2024.
SECTION 38. (1) If this 2023 Act does not become effective  until after June 30, 2023, the
amendments to section 23, chapter 10, Oregon Laws 2020 (second  special session), by section
37 of this 2023 Act revive sections 21 and 22, chapter 10, Oregon Laws 2020  (second special
session). If this 2023 Act does not become effective until after June 30,  2023, this 2023 Act
shall be operative retroactively to  that date, and the operation and effect of sections 21 and
22, chapter 10, Oregon Laws 2020 (second special session), shall continue  unaffected from
June 30,  2023, to the effective date of this 2023 Act and thereafter. Any otherwise lawful
action taken or otherwise lawful obligation incurred under the  authority of sections 21 and
22, chapter 10, Oregon Laws  2020 (second special session), after June 30, 2023, and before the
effective date of this 2023 Act, is ratified and approved.
(2) If this 2023 Act does not become effective until after June 30,  2023, any amounts
transferred to the Administrative Services  Economic Development Fund by operation of
section 22a, chapter 10, Oregon Laws 2020 (second special session), shall be  transferred to
the Tide Gate Grant and Loan Fund  established under section 21, chapter 10, Oregon Laws
2020 (second special session).
MAXIMUM NUMBER OF STATE EMPLOYEES
SECTION 39.  ORS 240.185 is amended to read:
240.185. (1) On and after January 1, 2018,  the number of persons employed by the state may not
exceed [ one] 1.5 percent of the state’s population of the prior year.
(2) The population figure shall be that required by ORS 190.510 to 190.610.
(3) This section applies to all full-time equivalent budgeted positions.
(4) This  section does not apply to the Governor, the Secretary of State, the State Treasurer, the
Supreme Court or the Legislative Assembly in the conduct  of duties vested in any of them by the
Oregon Constitution. However, this exception applies only to the office of  the Governor and not to
the executive branch of government.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1049 (SB 1049-A) Page 19
(5) This section does not  apply to personnel who administer unemployment insurance benefits
programs of the Employment Department, to personnel who administer programs required to be  im-
plemented as a condition for  the continued certification of the Employment Division Law by the
United States Secretary of Labor  or to personnel who administer programs implemented by the
United States  Department of Labor under federal law if the state is required to enter into contracts
to provide such programs.
(6) In order to assess  the effect of subsection (1) of this section, the Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services by December 31 of  each even-numbered year shall conduct a workload analysis
of each state agency, regardless of  whether the agency is exempt from the application of subsection
(1) of this section. The workload analysis of each agency shall be submitted to the  Legislative As-
sembly prior to its  convening in the subsequent odd-numbered year regular session and shall ac-
company the agency’s budget request before the Joint Ways and Means Committee.
STATE FORESTRY DEPARTMENT
SECTION 40.  Section 20, chapter 592, Oregon Laws 2021, is amended to read:
Sec. 20.  (1) The State Forestry Department  shall complete the operation of projects under sec-
tion 18 [ of this 2021 Act ], chapter 592, Oregon Laws 2021,  no later than June 30, [ 2023] 2025.
(2) The department  shall report regarding progress in carrying out projects under section 18
[of this 2021 Act ], chapter 592, Oregon Laws 2021,  to an  interim committee of the Legislative As-
sembly related to natural resources, in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and  to the Governor,
State Wildfire  Programs Director and Wildfire Programs Advisory Council no later than January
15, 2022. The report shall include, but need not be limited to:
(a) An explanation of how landscapes  were selected, a summary of the selected projects, a de-
scription of initial outcomes from projects selected  under the requirements established by section
18 [of this 2021 Act ], chapter 592, Oregon Laws 2021 , anticipated time frames  for completion of the
projects and any initial recommendations concerning landscape identification and projects selected
under the requirements established by section 18  [ of this 2021 Act], chapter 592, Oregon Laws
2021;
(b) A description of the funding source  types and amounts secured by the department as
matching funds to implement projects; and
(c) A summary of outreach and coordination with relevant federal and state  agencies, counties,
cities and other units of local government, federally recognized Indian  tribes in this state, public
and private forestland and rangeland owners, forestland and rangeland collaboratives and other
relevant community organizations to identify and select landscapes for treatment and develop se-
lection criteria for projects.
(3)(a) The department shall report its findings and recommendations regarding wildfire risk  re-
duction on forestland and rangeland and in communities, based on information obtained  from the
projects described in section 18 [ of this 2021 Act ], chapter 592, Oregon Laws  2021, to an interim
committee of the Legislative  Assembly related to natural resources, in the manner provided by ORS
192.245, and  to the Governor, State Wildfire Programs Director and Wildfire Programs Advisory
Council no later than July 15, 2023. The report shall include, but need not be limited to:
(A) A qualitative and quantitative summary of  the project outcomes that, at a minimum, states
the number of  acres treated, the treatment actions carried out and any resulting or anticipated
changes in landscape conditions related to enhanced resiliency or  the mitigation of wildfire risk to
public values;
(B) The identification of barriers to more efficient implementation and achievement of goals  in
future wildfire risk reduction projects;
(C) A qualitative and quantitative summary of the use of prescribed fire  activities and invasive
annual grass treatments for wildfire risk reduction that, at a minimum, states the number  of acres
burned or treated and any resulting or anticipated changes in landscape conditions related to en-
hanced resiliency or the mitigation of wildfire risk to public values;
Enrolled Senate Bill 1049 (SB 1049-A) Page 20
(D) The identification of existing disincentives to, and  recommendation for reducing barriers to,
the use of prescribed fire;
(E) Recommendations for creating optimal working relationships with forestland or  rangeland
collaboratives and other relevant community organizations regarding future wildfire risk reduction
projects;
(F) A description of  the funding source types and amounts secured by the department as
matching funds to carry out projects; and
(G) Recommendations for investment in future wildfire risk reduction projects to  be carried out
in the 2023-2025 biennium.
(b) In developing the report required under  this subsection, the department shall work in coor-
dination with federal land management  agencies, institutions of higher education and third parties
to develop consistent performance measurements and condition-based  metrics for monitoring and
communicating the effectiveness of state investments and project actions in reducing wildfire risk
on public or private forestlands and rangelands and in communities.
JUUL SETTLEMENT
SECTION 41.
(1) Subject to subsection (2) of this section,  the Department of Justice shall
deposit proceeds from the Juul Settlement, plus any interest earned on such proceeds,  into
the Oregon Health Authority Fund established under ORS 413.101,  to be expended for pur-
poses consistent with the terms of the settlement.
(2) Before making the  deposit under subsection (1) of this section, the Department of
Justice shall deduct from  the proceeds the amount of costs and expenses of the department
associated with the settlement.
(3) As used in this section, “Juul Settlement” means the settlement between  the State
of Oregon and Juul  Labs, Inc. announced on September 6, 2022, and any modifications
thereto.
MONSANTO SETTLEMENT
SECTION 42. As used in sections 43 and 44 of  this 2023 Act, “Monsanto Settlement
Agreement” means the settlement agreement between the State of  Oregon and Monsanto
Company, Pharmacia LLC and Solutia, Inc., effective December 15, 2022, and any modifica-
tions thereto.
SECTION 43. (1) The Polychlorinated Biphenyls Remediation and Restitution Account is
established in the State Treasury, separate  and distinct from the General Fund. Interest
earned by the account shall be credited to the account.
(2) The Polychlorinated Biphenyls Remediation and Restitution Account consists of:
(a) Proceeds of the Monsanto Settlement Agreement deposited into the account; and
(b) Other amounts deposited in the account from any other source.
(3) Moneys in the Polychlorinated Biphenyls Remediation and Restitution Account  are
continuously appropriated to the  Oregon Department of Administrative Services to be dis-
tributed by the department as directed by the Legislative Assembly. The  department shall
keep a record of moneys transferred into and out of the account.
(4) It is the intent of the Legislative Assembly to allocate moneys from  the
Polychlorinated Biphenyls Remediation and Restitution Account for  environmental remedi-
ation or restitutionary projects or purposes having  a nexus with environmental harms to air,
water, soil or other natural resources, including but not limited to:
(a) Restoring, maintaining and enhancing the quality of Oregon’s air, land, water  and
other natural resources;
(b) Brownfields remediation or development;
(c) Environmental or natural resource damage assessment or restoration;
Enrolled Senate Bill 1049 (SB 1049-A) Page 21
(d) Improvements to air or water quality;
(e) Cleanup of contaminated sites;
(f) Remediation of impaired water bodies, sediments or soil;
(g) Restoration or protection of wildlife  or wildlife habitats, including fish, aquatic life,
marine mammal or bird habitats; or
(h) Other similar air, water, soil or other natural resource environmental  remediation
or restitutionary projects.
SECTION 44.
(1) Subject to subsection (2) of this section,  the Department of Justice shall
deposit the proceeds of the Monsanto Settlement Agreement, and any  interest earnings from
the proceeds, in the Polychlorinated Biphenyls Remediation  and Restitution Account estab-
lished under section 43 of this 2023 Act.
(2) Before  making the deposit under subsection (1) of this section, the department shall
deduct from the proceeds of the Monsanto Settlement Agreement the costs  and expenses
associated with the Monsanto Settlement Agreement.
STUDENT VISION SCREENING REIMBURSEMENT RATE
SECTION 45.  ORS 336.211 is amended to read:
336.211. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Education provider” means:
(A) An entity that offers a  program that is recognized as an Oregon prekindergarten program
under ORS 329.170 to 329.200.
(B) A school district board.
(b) “Eye examination” means an eye examination that:
(A) Is conducted by a person licensed by the Oregon Board of Optometry  under ORS 683.010 to
683.340 or a person licensed by the Oregon Medical Board under ORS chapter  677 and trained in
eye surgery and eye disease; and
(B) Involves any diagnosis of the eye and any measurement or  assistance of the powers or range
of vision of the eye.
(c) “Vision screening” means an eye  screening test to identify potential vision health problems
that is conducted by a person who is:
(A) Licensed by the Oregon Board of Optometry under ORS 683.010 to 683.340;
(B) Licensed by  the Oregon Medical Board under ORS chapter 677 and trained in eye surgery
and eye disease;
(C) A health care practitioner acting in accordance with rules adopted by the State Board  of
Education; or
(D) A school nurse, an employee  of an education provider or a person or nonprofit entity des-
ignated by the Department of Education to  provide vision screening to students who is acting in
accordance with rules adopted by the State Board of Education.
(2)(a) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, each  education provider shall require
a student who is  seven years of age or younger and who is beginning an educational program with
the education provider for the first time to submit certification that the student received:
(A) A vision screening or an eye examination; and
(B) Any further examinations or necessary treatments of the eye  or assistance of the powers or
range of vision of the eye.
(b) The  certification required by this subsection must be provided no later than 120 days after
the student begins the educational program.
(3) A student is not required to submit certification as required under  subsection (2) of this
section if the student provides a statement from the parent or guardian of the student that:
(a) The student submitted certification to a prior education provider; or
(b) The vision screening  or eye examination is contrary to the religious beliefs of the student
or the parent or guardian of the student.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1049 (SB 1049-A) Page 22
(4) Each education provider shall:
(a) Ensure that the requirements of this section are met. Failure by a student  to meet the re-
quirements of this section may not result in  a program’s or school’s prohibiting the student from
attending the program or school, but may result in withholding report cards or similar actions.
(b) File in the student’s vision health  record any certifications and any results of a vision
screening or an eye examination known by the education provider.
(c) Provide the parent or guardian of  each student with information about the vision screenings
and eye examinations, and information about further examinations or necessary treatments.
(5)(a) Upon application of a person that provides  students with vision screenings, the Depart-
ment of Education shall reimburse the person for any necessary  expenses incurred by the person in
the provision of the vision screenings.
(b) A person may receive reimbursement  under this subsection for the provision of a vision
screening  to  any student of an education provider, regardless of whether the student has complied
with subsection (2) or (3) of this section. Nothing in this paragraph  removes the requirement that
a student must comply with subsection (2) or (3) of this section.
(c) Reimbursements made under this subsection:
(A) May not exceed [ $3.20] $4 per vision screening per student per school year.
(B) Must be paid from the Vision Health Account established under ORS 336.212.
(C) May not exceed amounts available in the Vision Health Account.
(6)(a) The State Board of  Education, in consultation with the Oregon Health Policy Board, shall
adopt by rule any standards for the implementation of this section.
(b) The State Board of Education shall adopt rules that:
(A) Prescribe the process by which a person or  nonprofit entity is designated by the Department
of Education to provide vision screenings; and
(B) Establish the process for providing reimbursements under subsection (5) of this section,  in-
cluding the prioritization of persons to receive a reimbursement if  the total amount available for
reimbursements exceeds the total amount requested for reimbursements.
SECTION 46.
The amendments to ORS 336.211 by section 45  of this 2023 Act apply to vi-
sion screenings provided on or after the effective date of this 2023 Act.
DRUG TREATMENT AND RECOVERY SERVICES FUND
SECTION 47.  ORS 305.231 is amended to read:
305.231. (1) The Department  of Revenue shall [ credit and transfer or cause to be credited and
transferred] transfer to the Drug Treatment and Recovery Services Fund the  savings to the State
of Oregon from the implementation of chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021, as calculated in ORS 293.665.
(2) If the savings calculated for any  subsequent biennium under ORS 293.665 (1) is less than for
any prior biennium, the amount [ credited and ] transferred to  the Drug Treatment and Recovery
Services Fund shall be the highest amount calculated for any previous biennium.
(3) The savings as calculated in ORS 293.665 shall be transferred on or before the end of the
fiscal year in which the calculation is completed.
(4) The department shall retain revenue from the tax imposed under ORS chapter 316 in
an amount necessary to make the transfer  required under this section. The department shall
make the transfer out of  the revenue in lieu of paying the revenue over to the State Treas-
urer for deposit in the General Fund.
SECTION 47a.  ORS 316.502, as amended by section 13, chapter 115, Oregon Laws 2022,  is
amended to read:
316.502. (1) The net revenue from the tax imposed by this chapter,  after deducting refunds and
amounts described in ORS 285B.630 [ and], 285C.635 and 305.231 , shall be paid over to the State
Treasurer  and  held in the General Fund as miscellaneous receipts available generally to meet any
expense or obligation of the State of Oregon lawfully incurred.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1049 (SB 1049-A) Page 23
(2) A working balance of unreceipted revenue from the  tax imposed by this chapter may be re-
tained for the payment of refunds, but such working balance shall not at the close  of any fiscal year
exceed the sum of $1 million.
(3) Moneys are continuously appropriated to the Department of Revenue to make:
(a) The refunds authorized under subsection (2) of this section; and
(b) The  refund payments in excess of tax liability authorized under ORS 315.174, 315.262, 315.264,
315.266 and 316.090 and section 3,  chapter 589, Oregon Laws 2021, and section 8, chapter 115,
Oregon Laws 2022.
OPIOID HARM REDUCTION
SECTION 48.
(1) The Opioid Reversal Medication  and Harm Reduction Clearinghouse
Bulk Purchasing Fund is established in the State Treasury, separate and distinct from the
General Fund. Interest earned by the  Opioid Reversal Medication and Harm Reduction
Clearinghouse Bulk Purchasing Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) The Opioid Reversal Medication and Harm Reduction  Clearinghouse Bulk Purchasing
Fund consists of:
(a) Moneys received by the Oregon Health Authority from opioid litigation settlements;
(b) Grants awarded for the purpose of addressing substance use and overdose  epidemics;
(c) Other gifts, grants, bequests, endowments or donations made to the fund; and
(d) Moneys appropriated to the fund by the Legislative Assembly.
(3) The moneys in the Opioid Reversal Medication and Harm Reduction  Clearinghouse
Bulk Purchasing Fund are continuously appropriated to the Oregon  Health Authority for
expenses related to opioid harm reduction.
EARLY LEARNING ACCOUNT
SECTION 49.
 ORS 327.269, as amended by section 20, chapter  631, Oregon Laws 2021, and
section 1, chapter 26, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill 427), is amended to read:
327.269. (1) The Early Learning Account is established within the Fund for Student Success.
(2) The Early Learning Account shall consist of:
(a) Moneys transferred from the Fund for Student Success under ORS 327.001;
(b) Moneys appropriated or otherwise transferred to the account by the Legislative Assembly;
(c) Amounts donated to the account; and
(d) Other amounts deposited into the account from any source.
(3) The Department of Education or the Department of  Early Learning and Care, on behalf of
the State of Oregon,  may solicit and accept gifts, grants, donations and other moneys from public
and private sources for the Early Learning Account. Moneys received as  provided in this subsection
shall be deposited into the Early Learning Account.
(4) Moneys in the Early Learning Account are continuously appropriated to  the  Department
of Education for :
(a) [ The Department of Education for ] Early childhood special education or early intervention
services, as provided by ORS 343.475; and
(b) Transfer to  the Department  of Early Learning and Care for early learning programs, as
described in ORS 327.274.
SECTION 50.
 ORS 327.274, as  amended by section 21, chapter 631, Oregon Laws 2021, section
30, chapter 27, Oregon Laws  2022, and section 2, chapter 26, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate
Bill 427), is amended to read:
327.274. (1) The Department of Education shall use moneys in the Early Learning Account :
(a) To provide funding for early childhood special  education or early intervention services, as
provided by ORS 343.475[ .]; and
Enrolled Senate Bill 1049 (SB 1049-A) Page 24
(b) For transfer to the Department of Early Learning and Care to provide funding  for
programs described in this section.
(2) The Department of Early Learning and Care shall use moneys [ in] transferred from  the
Early Learning Account to provide funding for early learning programs in a manner consistent with
a statewide early  learning system plan overseen by the Early Learning Council. Early learning
programs for which the department may use moneys transferred from the Early Learning Account
include:
(a) Relief nurseries;
(b) Programs funded by the Early Childhood Equity Fund;
(c) The Oregon prekindergarten program and other public preschool programs established under
ORS 329.170 to 329.200, by increasing:
(A) The total number of spaces for children served by the programs; or
(B) Existing spaces for full-day programs from half-day programs;
(d) Professional development for early childhood educators; and
(e) Early Head Start programs.
(3) In addition to the uses identified  in subsection (2) of this section, the Department of Early
Learning and Care may use moneys [ in] transferred from  the Early Learning Account for:
(a) Administrative, operational or program needs, including staffing,  of the Department of Early
Learning and Care for the purpose of implementing this section.
(b) Costs incurred by  the Department of Early Learning and Care in conducting the biennial
evaluation of programs that receive grants under ORS 417.782.
(4) The Early  Learning Council shall adopt rules necessary for the distribution of moneys under
this section.
STATE FIRE MARSHAL MOBILIZATION FUND
SECTION 51.
(1)(a) The  State Fire Marshal Mobilization Fund is established in the State
Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund.
(b) The State Fire Marshal Mobilization Fund consists of  moneys appropriated by the
Legislative Assembly for deposit in the fund, grant funds received by the Department of the
State Fire Marshal from the Federal Emergency Management  Agency, and other moneys
appropriated, allocated, deposited or transferred to the fund by the Legislative Assembly or
otherwise.
(c) Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to  the department for eligible
mobilization costs incurred by the department and reimbursements pursuant to ORS  476.560.
(2) As used in this section, “eligible mobilization costs” means expenses  incurred for
emergency mobilization and pre-positioning activities in Oregon.
SECTION 52.
 ORS 476.055 is amended to read:
476.055. (1) All moneys received by the Department  of the State Fire Marshal shall be paid into
the State Treasury,  and shall be placed by the State Treasurer to the credit of the State Fire Mar-
shal Fund, except those moneys received and accounted  for under the provisions of ORS 279A.290
and section 51 of this 2023 Act .
(2) Except as otherwise provided by this section, moneys in the State Fire Marshal Fund  shall
be available and constitute a continuing appropriation  for the payment of any expense of the de-
partment and  for the payment of expenses of the Department of Public Safety Standards and Train-
ing and the Board on  Public Safety Standards and Training relating to training programs concerning
fire services and accreditation of fire service professionals.  The Department of the State Fire Mar-
shal shall keep  on file an itemized statement of all expenses incurred by the department and shall
approve all disbursements as submitted for payment. Administrative  expenditures made from the
State Fire Marshal Fund shall not exceed a reasonable amount for the services performed.
INTERSTATE 5 BRIDGE REPLACEMENT PROJECT
Enrolled Senate Bill 1049 (SB 1049-A) Page 25
SECTION 53. Sections 3, 11, 12 and 13, chapter 4, Oregon Laws 2013, are repealed.
OREGON HEALTH AUTHORITY
SECTION 54.  Section 3, chapter ___, Oregon  Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill 3396), is amended
to read:
Sec. 3.  The Oregon Health Authority shall provide  [grants] reimbursements  to support clinical
education at hospitals and health care facilities.
SECTION 55.  Section 4, chapter ___, Oregon  Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill 3396), is amended
to read:
Sec. 4.  The Oregon Health Authority shall provide [ grants] reimbursements  to employers
participating in a labor-management training trust to expand  on-the-job training, apprenticeship op-
portunities and other programs that support the development  of health care professionals, including
medical technicians, certified nursing assistants and phlebotomists.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 56. The unit captions used in this 2023 Act are provided  only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of  this state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2023 Act.
EMERGENCY CLAUSE
SECTION 57. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate June 23, 2023
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 24, 2023
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1049 (SB 1049-A) Page 26